Massachusetts, session 194th, H252.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 18 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following paragraph: -
Upon being notified by the Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance
(DCAMM) that a lease is set to expire, and by which the Department decides not to renew a
lease or close the community service office, at least 120 days before taking steps to not renew a
lease for or close a community service office and at least 120 days before soliciting any
proposals for a lease for a community service office, the commissioner shall notify the local
legislators of that region and the regional legal services of the proposed action, the community
service office that would be affected, and the reasons for the proposed action. At the request of
of 2

the legislature or legal services, the department shall provide testimony and data regarding its
plans, including but not limited to a comparison of the current and proposed community service
office locations for low-income households in the service area with respect to (a) transportation
options, including the cost and frequency of public transit and travel time to and from the current
and proposed location; (b) office hours; (c) access for seniors, persons with disabilities, persons
who are needed to care for children or other family members; persons who are employed; (d) the
availability of staff who speak the languages spoken by persons with limited English proficiency
in the service area; (e) in areas where there are advisory boards the minutes showing that the
board has been appraised of the intention to close or relocate; (f) surveys from its current
recipients of how the proposed closure or relocation would affect them. The surveys shall be
done in the recipients’ primary or preferred language in order to maximize participation and
ensure equity; (g) a report of the community services, and community economic and social
relations near the current and proposed community service office; (h) demographic and poverty
rate data of the residents of both the current and proposed community service office location; and
(i) other matters as requested by the said requester.
of 2